Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 7. General Provisions and Application

38-38-701.
Application - use of term “foreclosure”.

Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the provisions of this article shall apply:

To proceedings for the foreclosure of deeds of trust through the public trustee commenced on or after July 1, 2007; and

In the case of proceedings and actions for enforcement or foreclosure of any other types of liens upon real property and in the case of sales by virtue of execution and levy, where the particular proceeding or action under which the sale is performed is commenced on or after July 1, 2007.

On and after October 1, 1990, in all proceedings for the foreclosure of deeds of trust and mortgages executed before July 1, 1965:

The provisions of sections 118-9-2 and 118-9-3, Colorado Revised Statutes 1963, as said sections existed prior to July 1, 1965, shall apply in lieu of section 38-38-302 and section 38-38-303 (1) to (3) as it existed prior to January 1, 2008; and

The provisions of section 118-9-18, Colorado Revised Statutes 1963, as in effect on July 1, 1965, and numbered as sections 38-38-103 and 38-38-104 on and after October 1, 1990, shall not apply.

Wherever the term “foreclosure”, or variations thereof, or the concept of “foreclosure” is used in or referred to in article 37, 38, or 39 of this title, it shall be deemed to include sales of real estate upon execution, unless the context otherwise requires.

If a deed of trust grants a power of sale to the public trustee but contains no provision on the manner in which the power of sale is to be exercised, the deed of trust shall not be void or voidable, and the holder of the evidence of debt may foreclose the deed of trust in accordance with the provisions of this article on the foreclosure of deeds of trust through the office of the public trustee or in the manner of a mortgage through the courts.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1674, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1) and (2)(a) amended and (4) added, p. 1480, § 38, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-39-119, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to subsections (1) and (2)(a) and for the enactment of subsection (4) by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-702.
Limitation of officer’s liability.

An officer shall not have responsibility or liability for determining:

The amount or reasonableness of a bid at a sale under section 38-38-106, the amount required to cure under section 38-38-104, or the amount required to redeem under section 38-38-302;

The accuracy of the legal description of property in a full or partial release of a deed of trust;

The accuracy or completeness of a mailing list submitted to the officer; or

The legal sufficiency of the description of the property contained in the notice of election and demand.

Nothing in this article shall lessen or otherwise modify the immunities and protections extended by law to an officer or to a governmental entity with which an officer is associated.

An officer shall not have responsibility or liability for unknown damage, debt, or liens when a third party seeks a judicial foreclosure and sale.

History.

Source:
L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1477, § 32, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(3) added,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 721, § 19, effective September 1.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for the enactment of this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-703.
No waiver of or agreement to shorten right to cure.

A waiver of or agreement to shorten the time period to exercise the right to cure a default granted by the provisions of this article that is made before the date of the default as to which the waiver is granted under a deed of trust, mortgage, or other instrument evidencing a lien or an evidence of debt secured thereby shall be void as against public policy.

History.

Source:
L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1477, § 32, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 721, § 20, effective September 1.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for the enactment of this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-704.
Providing information to homeowner and public.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed or any provision of law to the contrary, an officer may, at his or her discretion, provide to an owner of the property or to any person liable on the secured indebtedness or other lien being foreclosed, or otherwise make available to the general public, any educational or other information or material concerning foreclosures under this article, including available community resources and foreclosure prevention information, that has been approved by the office of the attorney general, by an agency of the state of Colorado or the federal government, or by an attorney currently licensed to practice and in good standing in the state of Colorado and retained by a public trustee for such purpose. The officer may charge the fees and costs of providing such information or materials to the property owner or person liable on the debt as foreclosure fees and costs; except that the amount of such fees and costs charged shall not exceed twenty-five dollars.

(1) (b)

This subsection (2) shall take effect July 1, 2007.

History.

Source:
L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1478, § 33, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

Subsection (1)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (1), effective July 1, 2007. (See

L

. 2006, p. 1478.)

38-38-705.
Curative provisions.

If the public trustee fails to comply with any of the notice deadlines set forth in this article, unless the foreclosure has already been withdrawn by the holder of the evidence of debt or the holder’s attorney, following written notice to the holder of the evidence of debt or the holder’s attorney, the public trustee may rerecord the notice of election and demand, and the public trustee shall thereafter comply with all such notice deadlines from the last recording date as set forth on the rerecorded notice of election and demand as though such foreclosure had been commenced on such date.

In the event of an error contained in any certificate of purchase, certificate of redemption, public trustee’s deed, or other recorded document prepared by the office of the public trustee, the public trustee may correct such error by executing and recording a scrivener’s error affidavit as set forth in section 38-35-109 (5).

History.

Source:
L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1728, § 7, effective June 1.